Massachusetts, session 194th, H1552.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall
be established an interagency supportive housing finance and strategy board (the “Board”) for
the purpose of scaling supportive housing options to end and prevent homelessness.
(a) The board shall consist of 18 members: the Lieutenant Governor, who shall serve as
chair; 7 members appointed by the Governor; 1 from the Community Action Hub with lived
experience of chronic or high acuity homelessness; 1 funder or group of funders of supportive
housing; 1 healthcare representative; 1 member of the supportive housing pipeline coalition; 1
representative of the Massachusetts Housing and Shelter Alliance; 1 representative of the
Citizens’ Housing and Planning Association; and 1 representative from the Massachusetts
Association for Mental Health; the secretary of the executive office of health and human
services, or their designee; the secretary of the executive office of housing and livable
communities, or their designee; the secretary of the executive office of veterans services, or their
of 5

designee; the commissioner of the department of children and families, or their designee; the
secretary of the executive office of aging and independence, or their designee; the commissioner
of the department of mental health, or their designee; ; the commissioner of the department of
transitional assistance, or their designee; the secretary of the executive office of administration
and finance, or their designee; the secretary of the executive office of labor and workforce
development, or their designee; and the commissioner of the department of correction, or their
designee.
(b) The board shall: (i) develop strategic and financial plans to guide the
Commonwealth’s creation of a pipeline of supportive housing; (ii) identify opportunities to
combine resources from the supportive housing pool fund, as established by chapter 121H of the
acts of 2024, and state agencies; and (iii) issue joint requests for proposals for supportive housing
to address chronic and high need homelessness in Massachusetts.
(c) All initial appointments shall be made by September 1, 2025. The chair must convene
the first meeting by September 15, 2025. The executive office of housing and livable
communities may provide the board with staff and administrative support, subject to
appropriation.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall
be a supportive housing pilot program within the executive office of housing and livable
communities. The pilot shall provide a minimum of 2,000 units of supportive housing to
households, including individuals, families and young adults who are experiencing homelessness
or at risk of homelessness. The executive office of housing and livable communities may use the
supportive housing pool fund, established by chapter 150 of the acts of 2024, to implement the
of 5

initiative through the interagency supportive housing finance and strategy board. The executive
office of housing and livable communities shall set aside $1,000,000 annually in low- and
moderate-income housing tax credits for use by the supportive housing pilots initiative.
(b) The supportive housing pilots initiative program shall include: (i) a statewide
identification and prioritization process of households experiencing chronic homelessness or
with complex needs that prevents them from maintaining housing independently and includes
length of time homeless and service needs; (ii) regional coordination with local homelessness
system Continuums of Care (CoCs) to align and match housing and services, including access
options that are geographically equitable; (iii) homelessness system management staffing
resources and infrastructure to sufficiently staff access and coordination; (iv) identification,
prioritization, and creation of additional supportive housing resources dedicated for use by these
households; (v) identification of Medicaid housing benefits and service options that can be
leveraged for case management services and housing stability supports services; (vi)
development of a statewide process to set aside child care subsidies and supports, behavioral
health and other services for households served in the initiative.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
office of health and human services, the executive office of economic development, the
executive office of elder affairs, the executive office of veterans’ services, the department of
housing and livable communities, the department of transitional assistance, the department of
developmental services, the department of mental health, the department of children and
families, the department of youth services, the department of correction, the department of public
health, the Massachusetts rehabilitation commission, the Massachusetts commission for the
blind, the Massachusetts commission for the deaf and hard of hearing, the Massachusetts
of 5

Housing Finance Agency, the Massachusetts housing partnership and the Community Economic
Development Assistance Corporation shall develop and execute a memorandum of
understanding to be known as the community housing and services memorandum of
understanding. The memorandum of understanding shall include an action plan to coordinate the
procurement and availability of community-based supportive services, capital subsidies and
operating subsidies for new and existing housing available to residents with very low and
extremely low-incomes, as those terms are defined by the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development in 24 C.F.R. § 5.603. The action plan shall establish benchmarks to
assess financial savings to the commonwealth resulting from the avoidance of
institutionalization, shelter or nursing care due to the availability of community-based housing
supportive services. The memorandum of understanding shall identify and determine methods
and procedures for eliminating barriers and reducing fragmentation for the provision of
community-based supportive services and affordable housing. For the purposes of this act,
“community-based supportive services” shall include, but not be limited to, resident service
coordinators, housing support teams and other models to link very low and extremely low-
income tenants with services necessary to maintain their tenancy or direct community-based
social services, comprehensive institutional discharge planning services or other services
necessary to maintain a successful tenancy; provided, that receipt of services by a tenant with a
disability shall not be an eligibility requirement or a requirement of maintaining a tenancy under
the action plan.
The community housing and services memorandum of understanding shall be filed
annually, for a term of no less than 10 years, with the governor, the lieutenant governor, the joint
committee on housing, the joint committee on elder affairs, the joint committee on children,
of 5

families and persons with disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and means
not later than December 31, 202.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
office of health and human services and the executive office of housing and livable communities
shall develop a plan for pairing medicaid housing benefits and community-based behavioral
health services with supportive housing initiative units. The plan must be submitted to the
interagency supportive housing finance and strategy board, established in section 1 of this act,
and the clerks of the senate and of the house of representatives by July 1, 2025. Any federal
reimbursement for these services during implementation of the initiative must be credited to the
supportive housing fool fund.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
of 5